Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3115
Waiver of examination; when.

The department may waive all or portions of the examination required by section 38-3114 (1) if a psychologist has been licensed in another jurisdiction and if the requirements for licensure in that jurisdiction are equal to or exceed the requirements for licensure in Nebraska, (2) for psychologists meeting the requirements of section 38-3117, or (3) for an applicant who is board-certified in an area of professional psychology by the American Board of Professional Psychology.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 78;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.16;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1049.